Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-803
Violation; property under contract forfeited.

Any property owned under any contract or by any combination, or pursuant to any conspiracy, and being the subject thereof, mentioned in sections 59-801 and 59-802, shall be forfeited to the state.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 3, p. 636;

R.S.1913, § 4047;

C.S.1922, § 3450;

C.S.1929, § 59-803;

R.S.1943, § 59-803.